languages/apertium-lvs/apertium-lvs.lvs.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzÀÁÂÃÄÅÆÇÈÉÊËÍÏÑÓÕÖØÚÜÝßàáâãäåæçèéêëíîïñóõöøúûüýĀāĂăĄąĆćČčĎďĐÐđðþÞĒēĖėĘęĚěĞğĢģĪÎīĶķĻļĽľŁłŃńŅņŇňŐőŘřŚśŞşŠšŢţŤťŪūŰűŹźŻżŽžǍǎȘșȚț</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"        c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"       c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="adv"      c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="adj"      c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"    c="Verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"    c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"    c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="prn"      c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="np"       c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="det"      c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"   c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"   c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"   c="Coordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"   c="Preadverbial"/>
    <sdef n="num"      c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"     c="Abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="ij"       c="Interjection"/>

    <sdef n="tv"       c="Transitive"/>
    <sdef n="iv"       c="Intransitive"/>
    <sdef n="ref"      c="Reflexive"/>
    <sdef n="TD"       c="Transitivity unknown"/>

    <sdef n="acr"      c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="rel"      c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="pers"     c="Personal"/>
    <sdef n="al"       c="Other"/>
    <sdef n="ant"      c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="nom"      c="Nominatīvs"/>
    <sdef n="gen"      c="Ģenitīvs"/>
    <sdef n="abl"      c="Ablative"/>
    <sdef n="dat"      c="Datīvs"/>
    <sdef n="acc"      c="Akuzatīvs"/>
    <sdef n="ins"      c="Instrumental"/>
    <sdef n="loc"      c="Lokatīvs"/>
    <sdef n="voc"      c="Vokatīvs"/>
    <sdef n="pos"      c="Possessive"/>

    <sdef n="comp"     c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"      c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="sg"       c="Vienskaitlis"/>
    <sdef n="pl"       c="Daudzskaitlis"/>
    <sdef n="sp"       c="Singular / plural"/>

    <sdef n="m"        c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"        c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="mf"       c="Masculine / feminine"/>

    <sdef n="pres"     c="Tagadne"/>
    <sdef n="past"     c="Pagātne"/>
    <sdef n="prs"      c="Subjunctive"/>
    <sdef n="deb"      c="Debitive"/>
    <sdef n="fut"      c="Nākotne"/>
    <sdef n="imp"      c="Imperative"/>

    <sdef n="p1"       c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"       c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"       c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="inf"      c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="top"      c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="emph"     c="Emphatic"/>
    <sdef n="itg"      c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="dem"      c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="indecl"   c="Undeclinable"/> <!-- CHECK-->
    <sdef n="ind"      c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="neg"      c="Negative"/>
    <sdef n="sint"     c="Synthetic"/>
    <sdef n="pp"       c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="pasv"     c="Passive"/>
    <sdef n="actv"     c="Active"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"     c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="subst"    c="Substantive"/>
    <sdef n="def"      c="Definite"/>

    <sdef n="apos"     c="Apostrophe"/>
    <sdef n="cm"       c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="guio"     c="Hyphen"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"     c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"    c="Left quotation mark"/>
    <sdef n="quot"     c="Quotation mark"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"     c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"    c="Right quotation mark"/>
    <sdef n="sent"     c="End of sentence"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
 
    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e>        <p>          <l>-</l>          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>–</l>          <r>–<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e>        <p><l>,</l><r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e>        <p><l>'</l><r>'<s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e>        <re>[.\?;:!…]</re>        <p>          <l/>          <r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>        <re>[\(\[]</re>        <p>          <l/>          <r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e>        <re>[\)\]]</re>        <p>          <l/>          <r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="quotes">
      <e>        <re>[„“«]</re>        <p>          <l/>          <r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <re>[”»]</re>        <p>          <l/>          <r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <re>["]</re>        <p>          <l/>          <r><s n="quot"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>°C</l><r><b/>°C<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l> °C</l><r><b/>°C<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l><b/>%</l><r><b/>%<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l>%</l><r><b/>%<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l> %</l><r><b/>%<s n="num"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="EUR__abbr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <!-- SECTION: Interjections -->
 
    <pardef n="nē__ij">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->

    <pardef n="un__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lai__cnjsub">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kamēr__cnjadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="ap__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <!-- SECTION: Prefixes -->

    <pardef n="ne">
      <e><p><l></l><r></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ne</l><r>ne<s n="adv"/><j/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="ļoti__preadv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ārā__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kur__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="klus/i__adv">
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>āk</l><r>i<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="klus/i__adv_sint_sup">
      <e><p><l>āk</l><r>i<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tāl/u__adv">
      <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>āk</l><r>u<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tāl/u__adv_sint_sup">
      <e><p><l>āk</l><r>u<s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="maz__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>āk</l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="maz__adv_sint_sup">
      <e><p><l>āk</l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->
  

    <e lm="arī"><i>arī</i><par n="un__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="bet"><i>bet</i><par n="un__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="vai arī"><i>vai<b/>arī</i><par n="un__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="tomēr"><i>tomēr</i><par n="un__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="taču" r="LR"><p><l>tač<b/>-<b/>ču</l><r>taču</r></p><par n="un__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="nekā"><i>nekā</i><par n="un__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="iekams"><i>iekams</i><par n="lai__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ja"><i>ja</i><par n="lai__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="jo"><i>jo</i><par n="lai__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ka"><i>ka</i><par n="lai__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="lai arī"><i>lai<b/>arī</i><par n="lai__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="kaut"><i>kaut</i><par n="lai__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="kamēr"><i>kamēr</i><par n="kamēr__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="tiklīdz"><i>tiklīdz</i><par n="kamēr__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="kaut arī"><i>kaut<b/>arī</i><par n="kamēr__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="tādēļ ka"><i>tādēļ<b/>ka</i><par n="kamēr__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="pirms"><i>pirms</i><par n="kamēr__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="līdzko"><i>līdzko</i><par n="kamēr__cnjadv"/></e>
    <e lm="ārpus"><i>ārpus</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="dēļ"><i>dēļ</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="iekšpus"><i>iekšpus</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="labad"><i>labad</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="no"><i>no</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="pār"><i>pār</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="starp"><i>starp</i><par n="ap__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ļoti"><i>ļoti</i><par n="ļoti__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="kur"><i>kur</i><par n="kur__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kāpēc"><i>kāpēc</i><par n="kur__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vai"><i>vai</i><par n="kur__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tagad"><i>tagad</i><par n="ārā__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="atpakaļ"><i>atpakaļ</i><par n="ārā__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="milzumdaudz"><i>milzumdaudz</i><par n="ārā__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="prom"><i>prom</i><par n="ārā__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="treškārt"><i>treškārt</i><par n="ārā__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tālu"><i>tāl</i><par n="tāl/u__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tālu"><p><l>vistāl</l><r>tāl</r></p><par n="tāl/u__adv_sint_sup"/></e>
    <e lm="tuvu"><i>tuv</i><par n="tāl/u__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tuvu"><p><l>vistuv</l><r>tuv</r></p><par n="tāl/u__adv_sint_sup"/></e>
    <e lm="cauri"><i>caur</i><par n="klus/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cauri"><p><l>viscaur</l><r>caur</r></p><par n="klus/i__adv_sint_sup"/></e>
    <e lm="īsti"><i>īst</i><par n="klus/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="īsti"><p><l>visīst</l><r>īst</r></p><par n="klus/i__adv_sint_sup"/></e>
    <e lm="agri"><i>agr</i><par n="klus/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="agri"><p><l>visagr</l><r>agr</r></p><par n="klus/i__adv_sint_sup"/></e>
    <e lm="drīzi"><i>drīz</i><par n="klus/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="drīzi"><p><l>visdrīz</l><r>drīz</r></p><par n="klus/i__adv_sint_sup"/></e>
    <e lm="ticami"><i>ticam</i><par n="klus/i__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ticami"><p><l>visticam</l><r>ticam</r></p><par n="klus/i__adv_sint_sup"/></e>
    <e lm="daudz"><i>daudz</i><par n="maz__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="daudz"><p><l>visdaudz</l><r>daudz</r></p><par n="maz__adv_sint_sup"/></e>
    <e lm="labprāt"><i>labprāt</i><par n="maz__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="labprāt"><p><l>vislabprāt</l><r>labprāt</r></p><par n="maz__adv_sint_sup"/></e>
    <e lm="maz"><i>maz</i><par n="maz__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="maz"><p><l>vismaz</l><r>maz</r></p><par n="maz__adv_sint_sup"/></e>
    <e lm="pār"><i>pār</i><par n="maz__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="pār"><p><l>vispār</l><r>pār</r></p><par n="maz__adv_sint_sup"/></e>
    <e lm="sen"><i>sen</i><par n="maz__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sen"><p><l>vissen</l><r>sen</r></p><par n="maz__adv_sint_sup"/></e>
    <e lm="skatīties"><par n="ne"/><i>skat</i><par n="skat/īties__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mācīt"><par n="ne"/><i>māc</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pakratīt"><par n="ne"/><i>pakrat</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sašķaidīt"><par n="ne"/><i>sašķaid</i><par n="dar/īt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lidot">           <par n="ne"/><i>lido</i><par n="lido/t__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="izmantot">        <par n="ne"/><i>izmanto</i><par n="apvieno/t__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="t. i.">            <i>t.<b/>i.</i><par n="EUR__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="u. c.">            <i>u.<b/>c.</i><par n="EUR__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="u. tml.">            <i>u.<b/>tml.</i><par n="EUR__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="š. g.">            <i>š.<b/>g.</i><par n="EUR__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="z. v.">            <i>z.<b/>v.</i><par n="EUR__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="piem.">           <i>piem.</i><par n="EUR__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="nē">              <i>nē</i><par n="nē__ij"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="cometa"/></e>
    <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
    <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
    <e><par n="quotes"/></e>
    <e><par n="guionet"/></e>
